src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! The LATVIAN language nouns inflect in cases.


LEXICON N-MSC-1_1
 +N: NMN_1_ ;
LEXICON NMN_1_ !!= * _@CODE@_ abinieks:abiniek
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:s   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:a   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:am  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ā   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:s   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:    K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-2_1
 +N: NMN_2_ ;
LEXICON NMN_2_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:š   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:a   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:am  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:u   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ā   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:š   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:    K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-3_2
 +N: NMN_3_ ;
LEXICON NMN_3_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:is  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:a   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:im  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ī   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-4_2
 +N: NMN_4_ ;
LEXICON NMN_4_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:s   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:s   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:im  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ī   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:0   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:s   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-5_2
 +N: NMN_5_ ;
LEXICON NMN_5_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:s   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:a   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:im  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ī   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:i   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-6_3
 +N: NMN_6_ ;
LEXICON NMN_6_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:us  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:i   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:us  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u   K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:um  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:iem K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:u   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ū   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:os  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:us  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:u   K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:i   K ;

LEXICON N-FEM-7_4
 +N: NMN-FEM_7ROKA_ ;
LEXICON NMN-FEM_7ROKA_  !!= * __@CODE@__ roka:rok
          +Fem+Sg+Nom:a  K ;
          +Fem+Sg+Gen:as K ;
          +Fem+Sg+Dat:ai K ;
          +Fem+Sg+Acc:u  K ;
          +Fem+Sg+Loc:ā  K ;
          +Fem+Sg+Voc:a  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Voc+Err/Orth:   K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Nom:as K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Gen:u  K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Dat:ām K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Acc:as K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Loc:ās K ;
          +Fem+Pl+Voc:as K ;


LEXICON N-MSC-8_4
 +N: NMN-MSC_8PUIKA_ ;
LEXICON NMN-MSC_8PUIKA_ !!= * __@CODE@__ puika:puik
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:a  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:as K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:am K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:u  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ā  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:a  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:as K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:ām K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:as K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:ās K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:as K ;

LEXICON N-FEM-9_5
 +N: NMN_9_ ;
LEXICON NMN_9_
 +Fem+Sg+Nom:e  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen:es K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat:ei K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc:i  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Loc:ē  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Voc:e  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Voc:   K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom:es K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen:u  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat:ēm K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc:es K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Loc:ēs K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Voc:es K ;

LEXICON N-MSC-10_5
 +N: NMN_10_ ;
LEXICON NMN_10_
 +Msc+Sg+Nom:e  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom:es K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen:es K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen:u  K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:em K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat:ēm K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:i  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc:es K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Loc:ē  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Loc:ēs K ;
 +Msc+Sg+Voc:e  K ;
 +Msc+Pl+Voc:es K ;

LEXICON N-FEM-11_6
 +N: NMN_11_ ;
LEXICON NMN_11_
 +Fem+Sg+Nom:s  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom:is K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen:s  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen:u  K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat:ij K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat:īm K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc:i  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc:is K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Loc:ī  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Loc:īs K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Voc:s  K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Voc:is K ;

LEXICON N--12_Nepiemīt
 +N: NMN_12_ ;
LEXICON NMN_12_
 +Fem+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen: K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat: K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc: K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Loc: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Loc: K ;
 +Fem+Sg+Voc: K ;
 +Fem+Pl+Voc: K ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
